tr: Sim efekt türü: AB (aurora borealis); Renk değiştiren; Karanlıkta parlayan; Holografik; Yanardöner; Mat; Metalik; Neon; Opak; Reflektif; Işıltılı; Saydam; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta učinka bleščic: AB (aurora borealis); Spreminjanje barv; Svetleče v temi; Holografsko; Prelivajoče se; Matirano; Kovinsko; Neonsko; Neprosojno; Odsevno; Svetlikajoče se; Prozorno; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип брокатен ефект: AB (Aurora Borealis); Променящ се цвят; Светещ в тъмното; Холограмен; Иридисцентен; Матов; Металик; Неон; Непрозрачен; Светлоотразителен; Блестящ; Прозрачен; Друго
es: Tipo de efecto de la brillantina: AB (aurora boreal); Cambio de color; Brilla en la oscuridad; Holográfico; Iridiscente; Mate; Metálico; Neón; Opaco; Reflectante; Brillante; Transparente; Otro
cs: Typ třpytivého efektu: AB (aurora borealis); Měnící barvu; Svítící ve tmě; Holografický; Iridescentní; Matný; Metalický; Neonový; Neprůhledný; Reflexní; Třpytivý; Průhledný; Ostatní
zh-TW: 亮粉效果類型: AB (幻彩); 變色; 夜光; 全息; 虹彩; 霧面; 金屬色; 螢光; 不透明; 反光; 珠光; 透明; 其他
ko: 글리터 효과 유형: AB(오로라 보레알리스); 컬러 시프트; 야광; 홀로그래픽; 무지갯빛; 매트; 메탈릭; 네온; 불투명; 반사; 쉬머; 투명; 기타
hu: Csillámos hatás típusa: AB (aurora borealis); Színváltós; Sötétben világító; Holografikus; Irizáló; Matt; Fémes; Neon; Átlátszatlan; Fényvisszaverő; Csillámló; Átlátszó; Egyéb
ru: Тип эффекта блесток: АВ (северное сияние); Хамелеон; Светящийся в темноте; Голографический; Перламутровый; Матовый; Металлик; Неоновый; Непрозрачный; Светоотражающий; Шиммер; Прозрачный; Другое
zh-CN: 亮片效果类型: AB（极光）; 变色; 夜光; 镭射; 虹彩; 哑光; 金属色; 荧光色; 不透明; 反光; 微闪; 透明; 其他
fi: Kimalletehosteen tyyppi: AB (aurora borealis); Väriä vaihtava; Pimeässä hohtava; Holograafinen; Helmiäishohtoinen; Matta; Metallinhohtoinen; Neon; Läpinäkymätön; Heijastava; Kimaltava; Läpinäkyvä; Muu
el: Τύπος εφέ γκλίτερ: AB (Βόρειο Σέλας); Αλλαγή χρώματος; Λάμψη στο σκοτάδι; Ολογραφικό; Ιριδίζον; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Νέον; Αδιαφανές; Ανακλαστικό; Λαμπερό; Διάφανο; Άλλο
th: ประเภทเอฟเฟกต์กลิตเตอร์: AB (สะท้อนแสงสีรุ้ง); เปลี่ยนสี; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; โฮโลแกรม; สีรุ้งวาววับ; เนื้อแมตต์; เมทัลลิก; นีออน; ทึบแสง; สะท้อนแสง; ชิมเมอร์; โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
de: Art des Glitzereffekts: AB (Aurora Borealis); Farbwechsel; Leuchtet im Dunkeln; Holografisch; Irisierend; Matt; Metallic; Neon; Deckend; Reflektierend; Schimmernd; Transparent; Sonstige
vi: Loại hiệu ứng lấp lánh: AB (hiệu ứng cực quang); Chuyển màu; Phát sáng trong bóng tối; Holographic; Ánh xà cừ; Mờ; Ánh kim; Neon; Đục; Phản quang; Lấp lánh; Trong suốt; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta efekta svjetlucanja: AB (aurora borealis); Promjena boje; Svijetli u mraku; Holografski; Preljevnih boja; Mat; Metalik; Neonski; Neprozirno; Reflektirajuće; Svjetlucavo; Prozirno; Ostalo
it: Tipo di effetto glitter: AB (aurora boreale); Cangiante; Fosforescente; Olografico; Iridescente; Opaco; Metallizzato; Fluo; Coprente; Riflettente; Luccicante; Trasparente; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de efeito do glitter: AB (aurora boreal); Mudança de cor; Brilha no escuro; Holográfico; Iridescente; Fosco; Metálico; Neon; Opaco; Refletivo; Cintilante; Transparente; Outro
ro-RO: Tip efect sclipici: AB (auroră boreală); Schimbare de culoare; Fosforescent; Holografic; Iridescent; Mat; Metalizat; Neon; Opac; Reflectorizant; Strălucitor; Transparent; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de efeito brilhante: AB (aurora boreal); Mudança de cor; Brilha no escuro; Holográfico; Iridescente; Mate; Metálico; Néon; Opaco; Refletor; Cintilante; Transparente; Outro
ja: グリッター効果タイプ: AB (オーロラ); カラーシフト; 蓄光; ホログラフィック; イリディセント; マット; メタリック; ネオン; 不透明; リフレクティブ; シマー; 透明; その他
fr: Type d’effet des paillettes: AB (aurore boréale); Changement de couleur; Phosphorescent; Holographique; Irisé; Mat; Métallique; Fluo; Opaque; Réfléchissant; Brillant; Transparent; Autre
da: Type af glimmereffekt: AB (aurora borealis); Farveskift; Selvlysende; Holografisk; Iriserende; Mat; Metallisk; Neon; Uigennemsigtig; Reflekterende; Glitrende; Gennemsigtig; Andet
nl: Glitter effecttype: AB (aurora borealis); Kleurveranderend; Glow-in-the-dark; Holografisch; Iriserend; Mat; Metallic; Neon; Opaak; Reflecterend; Shimmer; Transparant; Overig
sk-SK: Typ trblietavého efektu: AB (polárna žiara); Zmena farby; Svietiace v tme; Holografické; Iridescentné; Matné; Metalické; Neónové; Nepriehľadné; Reflexné; Trblietavé; Priehľadné; Iné
en: Glitter effect type: AB (aurora borealis); Color-shift; Glow-in-the-dark; Holographic; Iridescent; Matte; Metallic; Neon; Opaque; Reflective; Shimmer; Transparent; Other
sv: Glittereffekttyp: AB (aurora borealis); Färgskiftande; Självlysande; Holografisk; Regnbågsskimrande; Matt; Metallisk; Neon; Opak; Reflekterande; Skimmer; Transparent; Övrigt
lt-LT: Blizgučių efekto tipas: AB („aurora borealis“); Keičiantis spalvą; Švytintis tamsoje; Holografinis; Vaivorykštinis; Matinis; Metalizuotas; Neoninis; Nepermatomas; Atspindintis; Žėrintis; Permatomas; Kita
nb: Glittereffekttype: AB (aurora borealis); Fargeskiftende; Selvlysende; Holografisk; Iriserende; Matt; Metallisk; Neon; Dekkende; Reflekterende; Skimmer; Gjennomsiktig; Annet
pl: Typ efektu brokatu: AB (aurora borealis); Zmieniający kolor; Świecący w ciemności; Holograficzny; Opalizujący; Matowy; Metaliczny; Neonowy; Kryjący; Odblaskowy; Połyskujący; Przezroczysty; Inny